Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6917
Act; violation; exemption from liability.

No woman upon whom an abortion is attempted, induced, or performed shall be liable for a violation of the Preborn Child Protection Act.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 6.